src/TestLexc-noun.txt
LEXICON pek-Gen-Attributes
 Clitic ; !This means that stem is word final !!!
+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Indef+GenIndef:%>О1нь Tenses-Obl ;
+OrthOld+GenIndef+SOD:%>О1нсе Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthMorph+GenIndef+SOD:%>О1ньсе Nouns3-1 ;
+OrthPhon+GenIndef+SOD:%>О1нце Nouns3-1 ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON Possessives1
+Indef+NoPossPx: Tenses-Obl ;
 Possessives2 ;

LEXICON Possessives2
+Dial+Poss1Sg/м:%>О1м Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Sg/Н+NonNomSg:%>О1нЬ2 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Sg+NonNomSg:%>О1нзО1 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:%>О1нст Determinatives1 ;

! These are possessor Indices for non-nominative singular
! +NonNomSg
LEXICON osh-Possessives2
+Dial+Poss1Sg/м:%>О1м Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Sg/Н+NonNomSg:%>О1нЬ2 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Sg+NonNomSg:%>О1нзО1 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Pl:%>О1нО1к Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Pl:%>О1нк Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:%>О1ст Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:%>О1нст Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON kudo-Possessives2
+Poss1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Sg:%>нЬ2 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Sg:%>тЬ2 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Sg:%>нзО1 Determinatives1 ;
+Poss1Pl:%>нО1к Determinatives1 ;
+Poss2Pl:%>нк Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl:%>ст Determinatives1 ;
+Poss3Pl+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нст Determinatives1 ;

LEXICON Determinatives1
+SOD:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+OrthPhon+SOD:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
 Tenses-Obl ;


LEXICON Tenses-NomSg
+NoPredx: Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+1Sg:%>А2н Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+2Sg:%>А2т Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+3Sg: Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+1Sg:%>О1линь Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+2Sg:%>О1лить Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+3Sg:%>О1ль Clitic ;

LEXICON Tenses-NomPl
+NoPredx: Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:%>тА2но Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:%>тА2до Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+3Pl: Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:%>О1линек Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:%>О1лиде Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:%>О1льть Clitic ;

LEXICON Tenses-Abs
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:%>О1линек Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:%>О1лиде Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:%>О1льть Clitic ;
Tenses-Abs-1 ;

LEXICON Tenses-Abs-1
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:%>тА2но Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:%>тА2до Clitic ;

LEXICON Tenses-Obl
+NoPredx: Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+1Sg:%>А2н Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+2Sg:%>А2т Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+3Sg: Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+1Sg:%>О1линь Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+2Sg:%>О1лить Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+3Sg:%>О1ль Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+1Pl:%>тА2но Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+2Pl:%>тА2до Clitic ;
+Pred+Pres+3Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+1Pl:%>О1линек Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+2Pl:%>О1лиде Clitic ;
+Pred+PretII+3Pl:%>О1льть Clitic ;


! These have been introduced with the flag: <"@P.INDEF.PREF@">
! There is a counterpart which doesn't take a prefix.
! Only the counterpart is available for post-clitic -Гак
! Or relative pronoun/interrogative pronoun
!
LEXICON  Indef_Pronouns-pref
+Der/кой:кой- Indef_Pronouns ;
+Der/та:та- Indef_Pronouns ;
+Der/таго:таго- Indef_Pronouns ;


LEXICON  Indef_Pronouns


кие+Pron+Nom.Sg:кие Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кие+Pron+Nom.Sg:ки Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кие+Pron:ки kudo-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
ко+Pron+Interr:ко Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
ков+Spat+Lat:ков Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кода+Pron+Manner:кода Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Interr+Nom+Sg:кодамУ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Interr+Nom+Pl:кодат Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Interr+Pl+Det+Nom:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кодамо+Adn+Interr+Pl+Det:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
кодамо+Adn+Interr:кодамУ2 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
кува+Spat+Prl:кува Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

кона+Adn+Interr+Nom+Sg:кона Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
кона+Adn+Interr:кона Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

зярдо+Pron+Interr+Abl:зярдо Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зяро+Pron+Interr+Nom:зяро Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зяро+Pron+Interr:зяро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зяродо+Pron+Interr+Abl:зяродо Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!зяро+Pron+Interr+Ela:зяросто Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зяро+Pron+Interr+Ill:зярс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зярдо+Pron+Interr+Alb+Gen:зярдонь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

знярдо+Pron+Interr+Abl:знярдо Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зняро+Pron+Interr+Nom:зняро Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зняро+Pron+Interr:зняро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зняро+Pron+Interr+Ela:зняросто Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
зняро+Pron+Interr+Ill:знярс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
знярдо+Pron+Interr+Abl+Gen:знярдонь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

мезе+Pron+Nom+Sg:мезе Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr:мезе Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
мезе+Pron+Interr:мезе PossPX1 ;
!мезень+Pron+Interr+Gen:мезень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мень+Pron+Interr+Dep+Gen:мень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr:мезИ3 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+Nom+Pl:мезть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+OldOrth+Nom+Pl:месть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мекс+Pron+Interr+Transl:мекс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr:мейИ3 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+Transl:мезекс Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+Abl:мезде Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+Dat:мезнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+Abl+Det:мезденть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
мезе+Pron+Interr+Ine:мейсэ Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

мезе+Pron+Interr+Com:мезнек # ;




LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+VLoss+Pl+Nom:%>VLossтЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 
+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 
+Ela:%>стО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>с Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ela+Gen:%>стО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine+Gen:%>сО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen:%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>сО1 Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>зО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>зО1нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

+Nom.Def.Sg:%>сь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen.Def.Sg:%>нть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Def.Sg.Dat:%>нтень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen:%>тнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat:%>тненень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl.Indef.Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ; 

+Ela:%>стО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>с Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ela+Gen:%>стО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ine+Gen:%>сО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen:%>нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>сО1 Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>зО1 Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Ill:%>зО1нь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;

+Nom.Def.Sg:%>сь Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Gen.Def.Sg:%>нть Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Def.Sg.Dat:%>нтень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl.Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Gen:%>тнень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;
+Pl+Def.Pl+Dat:%>тненень Indef_Pronouns-Clitic ;


LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Clitic
<"@R.INDEF.PREF@"> Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-pref ;
<"@D.INDEF.PREF@"> Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-post ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-pref
+Pref+Clit+Indef: # ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Clitic-post
+Der/бути+Indef+Clt:%-бути # ;
+Der/Гак+Indef+Clt:%>Г1ак # ;
+Relat:  # ;
+Interr:  # ;

LEXICON PROP-M
можна+Adv+Foreign:можна Tenses-Obl ;
пецек+Adv+Coll:пецек pek-Gen-Attributes ;
авидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:авиде kudo-Possessives2 ;
васолбодидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:васолбодиде kudo-Possessives2 ;
лелидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:лелиде kudo-Possessives2 ;
тетидем+NCom+Anim+Assoc+Kin:тетиде kudo-Possessives2 ;
эська+Postp+Prl:эська kudo-Possessives2 ;
